trunk/incubator/apertium-es-ast.ast.dix
    <pardef n="band/íu__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>íu</l>
          <r>íu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ida</l>
          <r>íu<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>íos</l>
          <r>íu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>íes</l>
          <r>íu<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cam/ín__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ín</l>
          <r>ín<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inos</l>
          <r>ín<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ín</l>
          <r>ín<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inos</l>
          <r>ín<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="coma">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="actri/z__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ces</l>
          <r>z<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>z</l>
          <r>z<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ces</l>
          <r>z<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>z</l>
          <r>z<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="andalu/z__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>z</l>
          <r>z<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ces</l>
          <r>z<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>za</l>
          <r>z<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="abordaxe__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="franc/és__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>és</l>
          <r>és<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esa</l>
          <r>és<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eses</l>
          <r>és<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ab/á__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>á</l>
          <r>á<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adesa</l>
          <r>á<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ades</l>
          <r>á<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adeses</l>
          <r>á<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="alem/án__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anes</l>
          <r>án<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ana</l>
          <r>án<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>án</l>
          <r>án<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="llunes__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="académi/cu__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cu</l>
          <r>cu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ca</l>
          <r>cu<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cos</l>
          <r>cu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ques</l>
          <r>cu<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ayalg/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ues</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dí/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="adiv/ín__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ín</l>
          <r>ín<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inos</l>
          <r>ín<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="belg/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ues</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="almac/én__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enes</l>
          <r>én<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>én</l>
          <r>én<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="músi/ca__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ca</l>
          <r>ca<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ques</l>
          <r>ca<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="partenoxénesis__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="abd/ome__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ómenes</l>
          <r>ome<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ome</l>
          <r>ome<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="alcalde__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sa</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ses</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="patriar/ca__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ca</l>
          <r>ca<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ques</l>
          <r>ca<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="costín"><i>cost</i><par n="cam/ín__n"/></e>
    <e lm="partenoxénesis"><i>partenoxénesis</i><par n="partenoxénesis__n"/></e>
    <e lm="día"><i>dí</i><par n="dí/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="martes"><i>martes</i><par n="llunes__n"/></e>
    <e lm="xueves"><i>xueves</i><par n="llunes__n"/></e>
    <e lm="costín"><i>cost</i><par n="cam/ín__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vienres"><i>vienres</i><par n="llunes__n"/></e>
    <e lm="patriarca"><i>patriar</i><par n="patriar/ca__n"/></e>
    <e lm="abá"><i>ab</i><par n="ab/á__n"/></e>
    <e lm="abarca"><i>abar</i><par n="músi/ca__n"/></e>
    <e lm="abdome"><i>abd</i><par n="abd/ome__n"/></e>
    <e lm="abelluga"><i>abellug</i><par n="ayalg/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="abeluga"><i>abelug</i><par n="ayalg/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="abén"><i>ab</i><par n="almac/én__n"/></e>
    <e lm="abrecartes"><i>abrecartes</i><par n="llunes__n"/></e>
    <e lm="abrelates"><i>abrelates</i><par n="llunes__n"/></e>
    <e lm="académicu"><i>académi</i><par n="académi/cu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="acelga"><i>acelg</i><par n="ayalg/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="acidez"><i>acide</i><par n="actri/z__n"/></e>
    <e lm="actriz"><i>actri</i><par n="actri/z__n"/></e>
    <e lm="acústica"><i>acústi</i><par n="músi/ca__n"/></e>
    <e lm="adivín"><i>adiv</i><par n="adiv/ín__n"/></e>
    <e lm="adoquín"><i>adoqu</i><par n="adiv/ín__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aguanieve"><i>aguanieve</i><par n="abordaxe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="agudez"><i>agude</i><par n="actri/z__n"/></e>
    <e lm="albahaca"><i>albaha</i><par n="músi/ca__n"/></e>
    <e lm="albanés"><i>alban</i><par n="franc/és__n"/></e>
    <e lm="albóndiga"><i>albóndig</i><par n="ayalg/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alcalde"><i>alcalde</i><par n="alcalde__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aldega"><i>aldeg</i><par n="ayalg/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alemán"><i>alem</i><par n="alem/án__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alferga"><i>alferg</i><par n="ayalg/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alfoz"><i>alfo</i><par n="actri/z__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alicates"><i>alicates</i><par n="llunes__n"/></e>
    <e lm="almacén"><i>almac</i><par n="almac/én__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anales"><i>anales</i><par n="llunes__n"/></e>
    <e lm="andaluz"><i>andalu</i><par n="andalu/z__n"/></e>
    <e lm="andén"><i>and</i><par n="almac/én__n"/></e>
    <e lm="apéndiz"><i>apéndi</i><par n="actri/z__n"/></e>
    <e lm="apócope"><i>apócope</i><par n="abordaxe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aragonés"><i>aragon</i><par n="franc/és__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arca"><i>ar</i><par n="músi/ca__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arcén"><i>arc</i><par n="almac/én__n"/></e>
    <e lm="archiduque"><i>archiduque</i><par n="alcalde__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arruga"><i>arrug</i><par n="ayalg/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arzolín"><i>arzol</i><par n="adiv/ín__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aserrín"><i>aserr</i><par n="adiv/ín__n"/></e>
    <e lm="asesín"><i>ases</i><par n="cam/ín__n"/></e>
    <e lm="asperez"><i>aspere</i><par n="actri/z__n"/></e>
    <e lm="astrofísica"><i>astrofísi</i><par n="músi/ca__n"/></e>
    <e lm="astronave"><i>astronave</i><par n="abordaxe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="asturianolleonés"><i>asturianolleon</i><par n="franc/és__n"/></e>
    <e lm="atles"><i>atles</i><par n="llunes__n"/></e>
    <e lm="autodetermín"><i>autodeterm</i><par n="adiv/ín__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ave"><i>ave</i><par n="abordaxe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="avestruz"><i>avestru</i><par n="actri/z__n"/></e>
    <e lm="babayez"><i>babaye</i><par n="actri/z__n"/></e>
    <e lm="baillarín"><i>baillar</i><par n="adiv/ín__n"/></e>
    <e lm="balalaica"><i>balalai</i><par n="músi/ca__n"/></e>
    <e lm="balancín"><i>balanc</i><par n="adiv/ín__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bandíu"><i>band</i><par n="band/íu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barbarie"><i>barbarie</i><par n="abordaxe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barquín"><i>barqu</i><par n="adiv/ín__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barraca"><i>barra</i><par n="músi/ca__n"/></e>
    <e lm="base"><i>base</i><par n="abordaxe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="batanga"><i>batang</i><par n="ayalg/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="batiente"><i>batiente</i><par n="abordaxe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bauprés"><i>baupr</i><par n="franc/és__n"/></e>
    <e lm="baxez"><i>baxe</i><par n="actri/z__n"/></e>
    <e lm="be"><i>be</i><par n="abordaxe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="beca"><i>be</i><par n="músi/ca__n"/></e>
    <e lm="belén"><i>bel</i><par n="almac/én__n"/></e>
    <e lm="belga"><i>belg</i><par n="belg/a__n"/></e>
